Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 332.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 332.4. A. The Chair of the Pardon and Parole Board
shall be selected by the Board. The Chair of the Pardon and Parole
Board shall receive Twenty-four Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars
($24,800.00) Forty-six Thousand Dollars ($46,000.00) per annum,
payable monthly, in the following allotment:
1. Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00)
for preparation for said such meeting; and
2. One Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-seven Dollars ($1,667.00)
Three Thousand Two Hundred Thirty-three Dollars and thirty-three
cents ($3,233.33) for the regular monthly Board meeting.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1330 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. The members of the Board shall receive Twenty-two Thousand
Eight Hundred Dollars ($22,800.00) Forty-two Thousand Dollars
($42,000.00) per annum, payable monthly in the following allotment:
1. Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00)
for preparation for said such meeting; and
2. One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) Two Thousand
Nine Hundred Dollars ($2,900.00) for the regular monthly Board
meeting.
C. 1. Failure of any member to attend one Board meeting in any
calendar year, except for justifiable excuse as determined by the
Chair pursuant to written policy established by the Board, shall
preclude the right of the member to receive his or her monthly
compensation established by subsection A or B of this section.
2. In addition, any member who fails to attend two or more
Board meetings in any calendar year except for extraordinary
circumstances as determined by the Chair pursuant to written policy
established by the Board shall be deemed to have committed official
misconduct as such term is defined by Section 93 of Title 51 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. To initiate a removal from office pursuant to
this paragraph, the Board shall pass a resolution by a majority of
the members of the Board detailing the alleged misconduct. Such
removal shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 3 of Title 51
of the Oklahoma Statutes.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1330 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Failure to attend meetings of the Board, pursuant to the
policy established by the Board, shall constitute cause for removal
pursuant to Section 10 of Article VI of the Oklahoma Constitution.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
February 18, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1330 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)